Indiana, session 2026, HB1356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-46.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 46.5. County Option Deduction for Agricultural
Resource Areas
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agricultural resource area"
means an agricultural resource area established under IC 14-40-2.
Sec. 2. (a) A county fiscal body of a county in which one (1) or
more agricultural resource areas are established may adopt an
ordinance to apply a property tax deduction in determining the
assessed value of all land within agricultural resource areas that
are located in the county.
(b) An ordinance adopted under this section must specify the
percentage of the deduction from assessed value to apply under
this chapter. The deduction percentage may not exceed fifteen
percent (15%) of the assessed value of the land within an
agricultural resource area. The same deduction percentage must
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


apply to all agricultural resource areas within the county.
Sec. 3. (a) If a county fiscal body wishes to adopt an ordinance
under section 2 of this chapter, the fiscal officer of the county shall,
in addition to any other notices required for the adoption of an
ordinance, issue a notice to the fiscal officer of each taxing unit that
would be affected by the adoption of the ordinance at least
twenty-one (21) days before the date on which the county fiscal
body intends to hold a hearing on the proposed ordinance.
(b) After the county fiscal body hears the public testimony on
the proposed ordinance, the county fiscal body may adopt an
ordinance to have this chapter apply in the county.
Sec. 4. If an ordinance adopted under section 2 of this chapter
is in effect in a county, the county auditor shall apply the deduction
as adopted in the ordinance under section 2 of this chapter for each
assessment date that a parcel of land is located within an
agricultural resource area under the provisions set forth in
IC 14-40-2.
Sec. 5. If a county fiscal body has adopted an ordinance under
section 2 of this chapter, the fiscal officer of the county shall, before
December 31 of each year in which the ordinance is in effect,
provide a certified list of all agricultural resource areas in the
county, including the parcel number for each tract of land.
Sec. 6. A taxpayer who is eligible for the deduction provided by
this chapter is not required to take any action in order to receive
the deduction. A county auditor shall apply the appropriate
deduction to the assessed values of the eligible properties based on
the information received from the fiscal officer of the county.
SECTION 2. IC 14-40 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 40. CONSERVATION OF AGRICULTURAL LAND
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this article:
(1) "Agricultural production" means activities or conditions
conducted on land actively devoted to agriculture. The term
includes land enrolled in the federal Conservation Reserve
Program.
(2) "Agricultural resource area" means an agricultural
resource area established under IC 14-40-2.
(3) "Agricultural resource area commission" means an
agricultural resource area commission established under
IC 14-40-2-3.
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


(4) "Applicant" means anyone who owns five (5) acres or
more of land that has been in active agricultural or forest
production for the previous three (3) consecutive years and
who voluntarily applies for that land to be part of an
agricultural resource area under IC 14-40-2.
(5) "Department of agriculture" refers to the Indiana state
department of agriculture established by IC 15-11-2-1.
(6) "Hardship" means a situation or circumstance over which
a landowner in an agricultural resource area has no control
and can then petition for removal for reasons that include but
are not limited to an adverse result in litigation against the
farm or landowner, death of a close family member that
would lead to unanticipated financial hardships, significant
tax liabilities, bankruptcy due to another person's fraud, or
any other illegal activity.
(7) "Proposal" means written documents submitted to a
governing body or agricultural resource area commission
under IC 14-40-2 from a landowner regarding the
landowner's property.
Chapter 2. Agricultural Resource Areas
Sec. 1. Not later than January 1, 2027, each board of county
commissioners shall adopt an agricultural resource area ordinance
in accordance with applicable notice and hearing procedures. At
a minimum, the ordinance shall contain provisions that do the
following:
(1) Establish a process through which agricultural lands may
be placed in agricultural resource areas for a minimum of ten
(10) years.
(2) Establish the application requirements, including but not
limited to information about the landowner, a description of
the parcels, structures, and facilities proposed to be included
in an agricultural resource area, and the current uses of lands
proposed to be included in an agricultural resource area.
(3) Establish clear and objective standards for evaluating
applications for inclusion in an agricultural resource area.
(4) Establish the timeline for reviewing and making decisions
on agricultural resource area applications.
(5) Establish an application fee to cover the administrative
costs of processing applications, including but not limited to
reviewing application materials, holding public meetings and
hearings, providing public notice, recording applicable
documents, and updating county land use maps, provided that
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


such fee shall not exceed the lesser of the actual cost of
processing the application to include land in an agricultural
resource area or five hundred dollars ($500).
Sec. 2. (a) Land may be included in an agricultural resource
area only upon application of the landowner as set forth in this
chapter.
(b) Agricultural resource areas must be designated on future
land use planning maps.
(c) The designations of specific parcels of land as an agricultural
resource area shall not impact other parcels of land not designated
as agricultural resource areas.
Sec. 3. (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, each board of county
commissioners shall establish an agricultural resource area
commission.
(b) The commission shall consist of three (3) members as
follows:
(1) One (1) member who is a member of the board of county
commissioners or the member's designee, appointed by the
board of county commissioners.
(2) One (1) member who is a farmland owner and who resides
in the county, appointed by the board of county
commissioners.
(3) One (1) member who is an active farmer and farmland
owner in the county, appointed by the board of county
commissioners from recommendations submitted by the
county farm bureau.
(c) The term of a member of the commission is three (3) years.
The terms must be staggered so that the terms of not more than
two (2) members may expire in a year. A member of the
commission may be reappointed to successive terms at the pleasure
of the appointing authority.
(d) As part of its duties, the commission shall provide for
meetings and hearings to obtain advice on the agricultural needs
of the county. The commission may also conduct informal meetings
with public officials and agencies, agricultural professionals,
educational professionals, and other organizations to evaluate the
agricultural needs of the county.
(e) The commission may make recommendations to the board
of county commissioners concerning the process by which the
commission will accept, review, and offer recommendations
regarding agricultural resource area proposals to the board of
county commissioners, including the nature and type of
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


information provided by applicants and the evaluation criteria
required to review agricultural resource area applications.
(f) The commission shall review applications for inclusion in an
agricultural resource area pursuant to the county agricultural
resource area ordinance adopted in section 1 of this chapter and
make recommendations to the board of county commissioners
regarding such applications.
(g) The commission shall review applications to include eligible
land in an agricultural resource area and make recommendations
to the board of county commissioners within sixty (60) days of
receiving such applications.
Sec. 4. (a) Within sixty (60) days of receiving a recommendation
from the agricultural resource area commission to support or
reject an application, the board of county commissioners shall hold
a public hearing regarding the application. The board of county
commissioners shall give notice of the hearing under IC 5-3-1. The
board of county commissioners may approve or deny an
application to include land in an agricultural resource area. If
approved, the creation of an agricultural resource area shall be
effective upon final action of the board of county commissioners.
(b) If the board of county commissioners fails to take action on
the recommendation of the agricultural resource area commission
within sixty (60) days of receiving such recommendation, the
recommendation of the agricultural resource area commission
becomes final. A decision to approve or deny an agricultural
resource area shall be subject to judicial review.
Sec. 5. (a) In order to give constructive notice of the existence of
an agricultural resource area designation to all persons who have,
may acquire, or may seek to acquire an interest in land in or
adjacent to the agricultural resource area, within ten (10) days of
the creation of the agricultural resource area, the secretary of the
board of county commissioners shall file an executed document
with the county recorder containing:
(1) the date of creation or dissolution of the agricultural
resource area by the board of county commissioners;
(2) a legal description of the parcel or parcels of real property
to be included in the agricultural resource area that is
available through the county recorder's office; and
(3) a record of the findings of the agricultural resource area
commission and decision of the board of county
commissioners.
(b) The applicable governing body's failure to record the
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


agricultural resource area does not invalidate the decision to create
or dissolve an agricultural resource area.
Sec. 6. (a) The board of county commissioners must notify
landowners of agricultural resource areas at least one hundred
eighty (180) days prior to the expiration of their renewal options.
Ten (10) years after the creation of an agricultural resource area,
if the landowner desires to continue with the agricultural resource
area, no action on the part of the landowner is necessary and the
board of county commissioners shall automatically renew the
agricultural resource area for another ten (10) years.
(b) If the landowner desires to terminate the agricultural
resource area, written notice to the board of county commissioners
is required at least ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of the
agricultural resource area before the board of county
commissioners terminates the designation.
(c) The secretary of the board of county commissioners shall
record the renewal of an agricultural resource area with the
county recorder.
Sec. 7. (a) A landowner may add land to an existing agricultural
resource area by filing an application with the board of county
commissioners. The board of county commissioners shall review an
application to add land to an existing agricultural resource area in
accordance with this chapter.
(b) An owner of land within an agricultural resource area may
remove any or all of the land from the agricultural resource area
by filing a petition for removal with the board of county
commissioners. The board of county commissioners:
(1) shall acknowledge receipt of the petition for removal in
writing; and
(2) shall confirm the removal date as ten (10) years from the
date of petition for removal, or upon expiration of the
designation, whichever is sooner.
(c) The board of county commissioners shall establish a process
by which an owner of land within an agricultural resource area
may remove any or all of the land from the agricultural resource
area for reasons of hardship, as defined in IC 14-40-1-1(6).
(d) The board of county commissioners may charge an
administrative fee to cover administrative costs associated with
processing changes to an agricultural resource area, including but
not limited to updating land use maps, recording documents, and
reasonable staff time for processing the request, provided that such
fee shall not exceed the lesser of the actual cost of processing
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


changes to an agricultural resource area or five hundred dollars
($500). The secretary of the board of county commissioners shall
record the changes to an agricultural resource area with the county
recorder.
Sec. 8. (a) A board of county commissioners having created an
agricultural resource area shall encourage the continuity,
development, and viability of agricultural use within the specific
boundaries designated in the agricultural resource area by not
enacting a local law, ordinance, or regulation that would restrict
a farm structure or farming practice within the boundaries of the
agricultural resource area, unless such farm structure or farming
practice does not comply with generally recognized farming
practices or the farm structure or land use is in conflict with the
current agricultural land use classification or agricultural zoning
designation of the area.
(b) The board of county commissioners shall not change the
current agricultural land use classification or agricultural zoning
designation for parcels of land within an agricultural resource area
without written permission from the landowner.
(c) Upon routine review, the board of county commissioners
shall amend applicable land use planning maps to reflect the
boundaries of designated agricultural resource areas in compliance
with land use planning provisions under IC 36-7.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent a board of county
commissioners from regulating the siting of residential,
commercial, manufacturing, industrial, solar energy, or wind
energy structures, or other nonagricultural land uses on lands
included within an agricultural resource area.
Sec. 9. Agricultural activities or operations in an agricultural
resource area shall not constitute a public nuisance.
Sec. 10. The following apply to land within an agricultural
resource area:
(1) A political subdivision having or exercising eminent
domain powers may not condemn for any purpose any land
within an agricultural resource area without the landowner's
consent.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, any unit of government
seeking to exercise a right of eminent domain against land
within an agricultural resource area must establish that there
is no feasible alternative to such action.
(3) Land within an agricultural resource area cannot be
rezoned as nonagricultural use during the term of the
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


agricultural resource area.
(4) Any purchase of land abutting an agricultural resource
area must include a written disclosure informing the buyer of
the agricultural resource area landowner's rights under
IC 32-30-6 and this chapter.
(5) A county may enact a county option property tax
deduction under IC 6-1.1-46.5 for property tax assessments
during the ten (10) year term of the agricultural resource
area, or other financial benefits for participation in an
agricultural resource area as the board of county
commissioners may determine.
(6) Landowners within an agricultural resource area may
receive priority for any future agricultural economic
development, conservation, or land protection funding or tax
benefits from the state or the county in which the agricultural
resource area is located.
Chapter 3. Farmland Advisory Board
Sec. 1. (a) The farmland advisory board is established. The
board consists of five (5) voting members and one (1) nonvoting,
advisory member as follows:
(1) One (1) voting member who is in active agricultural
production in the state, appointed by the governor.
(2) One (1) voting member who is a representative from a
land trust and who holds an agricultural conservation
easement in Indiana, appointed by the governor.
(3) One (1) voting member who is a member of a county
government in Indiana, appointed by the governor.
(4) One (1) voting member who is a representative from the
Purdue extension Agricultural and Natural Resources
division, appointed by the dean of the Purdue College of
Agriculture.
(5) One (1) voting member who is an Indiana farmer and
landowner, appointed by Indiana's largest general farm
organization.
(6) One (1) nonvoting, advisory member from the department
of agriculture, appointed by the department of agriculture.
(b) The members appointed under subsection (a) serve at the
pleasure of the member's appointing authority.
(c) The members of the board shall elect a member to serve as
chair of the board.
(d) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a
quorum. A quorum is required for the board to take any action.
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


(e) The members of the board are entitled to reimbursement for
travel expenses in connection with the members' duties on the
board. The members of the board are not entitled to a salary per
diem.
(f) The department of agriculture may provide staff support to
the board.
(g) Any expenses of the board shall be paid from money
appropriated to the department of agriculture.
Sec. 2. The board shall do the following:
(1) Advise the department of agriculture on developing
standards for accepting, monitoring, and enforcing easements
that the department may hold under IC 15-11-2-3(c).
(2) Create and distribute a model agricultural resource area
ordinance for use by a board of county commissioners under
IC 14-40-2-1.
(3) Regularly review and collect feedback on agricultural
resource areas.
(4) Support education and outreach about agricultural
resource areas.
SECTION 3. IC 15-11-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2018,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this section, "biomass" means
agriculturally based sources of renewable energy, including the
following:
(1) Agricultural crops.
(2) Agricultural wastes and residues.
(3) Wood and wood byproducts, including the following:
(A) Wood residue.
(B) Forest thinning.
(C) Mill residue wood.
(4) Animal wastes.
(5) Animal byproducts.
(6) Aquatic plants.
(7) Algae.
The term does not include waste from construction and demolition.
(b) The department shall do the following:
(1) Provide administrative and staff support for the following:
(A) The state fair board for purposes of carrying out the
director's duties under IC 15-13-5.
(B) The Indiana corn marketing council for purposes of
administering the duties of the director under IC 15-15-12.
(C) The Indiana dairy industry development board for
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120


purposes of administering the duties of the director under
IC 15-18-5.
(D) The Indiana land resources council under IC 15-12-5.
(E) The Indiana grain buyers and warehouse licensing agency
under IC 26-3-7.
(F) The Indiana grain indemnity corporation under IC 26-4-3.
(G) The division.
(2) Administer the election of state fair board members under
IC 15-13-5.
(3) Administer state programs and laws promoting agricultural
trade.
(4) Administer state livestock or agriculture marketing grant
programs.
(5) Administer economic development efforts for agriculture by
doing the following:
(A) Promoting value added agricultural resources.
(B) Marketing Indiana agriculture to businesses
internationally.
(C) Assisting Indiana agricultural businesses with developing
partnerships with the Indiana economic development
corporation.
(D) Soliciting private funding for selective economic
development and trade initiatives.
(E) Providing for the orderly economic development and
growth of Indiana's agricultural economy.
(F) Facilitating the use of biomass and algae production
systems to generate renewable energy.
(6) Carry out the department's duties under IC 23-15-12.
(c) The department may do the following:
(1) Receive and hold (including as a coholder) agricultural
conservation easements acquired by donation of the owner or
by bequest or devise of a decedent, including agricultural
conservation easements partially funded by federal sources.
(2) Enter into agreements with nongovernment entities to
monitor agricultural conservation easements the department
may hold under this subsection, under terms and conditions
determined by the department.
2026 IN 1356—LS 7093/DI 120